Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-303
State agency; displaced state employees; plan of assistance.

A state agency that seeks to enter into a contract described in section 73-301 shall also submit to the Director of Administrative Services a formal plan of assistance to the state employees of such state agency who will be displaced by such contract. The plan shall include, but need not be limited to, the following provisions:

(1) Efforts by the state agency to place displaced employees in vacant positions in that agency or another state agency;

(2) Provisions in the contract for personal services, if feasible, for the hiring of displaced employees by the contractor; and

(3) Demonstration by the state agency that it has taken formal and positive steps in considering alternatives to such contract, including reorganization, reevaluation of service, and reevaluation of performance.

Laws 1995, LB 519, § 7.